Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3713
Certificate of authority; expiration date; renewal requirements; fee.

Certificates of authority issued pursuant to sections 44-3701 to 44-3721 shall expire annually on April 30, unless sooner revoked or suspended. No certificate of authority shall be renewed by the director until the club has:

(1) Paid an annual certificate of authority fee of one hundred dollars; and

(2) Filed a copy of its most recent financial statement prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and certified by two principal officers of the club or, in the event the applicant is not a corporation, such other persons as the director may require.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 13.